Washington statutes.
RCW 2.28.070

Contempt—Judicial officer may punish.

For the effectual exercise of the powers specified in RCW 2.28.060, a judicial officer may punish for contempt in the cases and manner provided by law.

[ 1891 c 54 s 7; RRS s 58.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: CR 45(f).

Contempts: Chapter 7.21 RCW.

Criminal contempts: Chapter 7.21 RCW, RCW 9.92.040.

Power of court to punish for contempt: RCW 2.28.020.

Witnesses, failure to attend as contempt: RCW 5.56.061 through 5.56.080.